Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2602
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the municipalities of the state face an urgent need to construct, upgrade, and develop municipal infrastructure facilities. By providing basic public facilities, the municipalities of the state provide the building blocks for economic development. Not only does the investment in infrastructure generate an immediate stream of economic activity, it also lays the groundwork for private investment that will use the facilities so provided. Municipalities in the state currently are in critical need of assistance in providing these facilities.

The Legislature determines that it is in the public interest to establish a Municipal Infrastructure Redevelopment Fund to provide funds to municipalities in the state to use to provide infrastructure facilities and to permit municipalities in the state to issue bonds secured by amounts payable from the Municipal Infrastructure Redevelopment Fund and other sources.

Laws 1989, LB 683, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 7.